Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Chapter 34. Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children.
Sec. 14.34.020.
Compact administrator.

Under the compact established under AS

14.34.010

, the commissioner may designate an officer as the compact administrator. The compact administrator shall cooperate with all departments, agencies, and officers of and in the government of this state and its subdivisions in facilitating the proper administration of the compact or of a supplementary agreement entered into by this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 2009)

Sec. 14.34.030.
State council.

The board shall designate a subcommittee of its membership to serve as the state council under AS

14.34.010

. Consistent with state law, the board shall designate other persons to serve on the subcommittee to complete the representation required by the compact established under AS

14.34.010

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 2009)

Sec. 14.34.040.
Regulations.

The board may adopt regulations to implement this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 2009)

Sec. 14.34.090.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children.

History.

(§ 1 ch 10 SLA 2009)